Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-105
Veterans; graves; headstones.

The grave of any deceased person described in section 80-104 shall be marked by a headstone containing the name of the deceased and the organization to which he or she belonged or in which he or she served. The county veterans service committee, upon the death and burial of any such person residing within such county at the time of his or her death, shall make application to the proper authorities of the government of the United States for a suitable headstone, as provided by Act of Congress, and cause the same to be placed at the head of the deceased person's grave.

Laws 1885, c. 39, § 2, p. 214;

R.S.1913, § 7159;

C.S.1922, § 6805;

C.S.1929, § 80-108;

R.S.1943, § 80-105;

Laws 1953, c. 324, § 5, p. 1072;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 23.